Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,309
Nebraska Sesquicentennial Commission;
members; vacancy; termination.

The
Nebraska Sesquicentennial Commission is hereby established. The commission
shall consist of seventeen members to be appointed by the Governor within
sixty days after July 1, 2014. The commission shall include members from all
regions of the state, representing all major interests and a diverse array
of industries. No more than eight of the members shall be affiliated with
the same political party. The members shall select a chairperson and a vice-chairperson,
and all members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses
as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The Governor shall fill any vacancy
occurring on the commission by appointment. For administrative and budgetary
purposes only, the commission shall be housed within the Nebraska State Historical
Society. The existence of the commission and terms of the members shall terminate
on June 30, 2018.

Laws 2014, LB744, § 1.
July 1, 2014June 30, 2018